Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.32
Retail, defined.

Retail, when used to describe a
sale, means a sale to any person other than a licensed dealer of any kind
licensed under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 44.